Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 4. Fraud, Crimes, and Investigations.

Sec. 21.36.355.
Felony convictions involving dishonesty or breach of trust.

A person who has a conviction for a felony involving dishonesty or a breach of trust may not engage or participate in the business of insurance without receiving prior written consent by the director or by the insurance regulatory official of the person’s home state as required under 18 U.S.C. 1033 and 1034 (Violent Crime Control and Law Enforcement Act of 1994).

A person who fails to seek prior written consent from the director under (a) of this section is in violation of this chapter.

A person who is engaged in the business of insurance may not knowingly permit the participation in the business of insurance by a person who has been convicted of a felony involving dishonesty or breach of trust except as allowed under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 71 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 16 ch 30 SLA 2009)

Sec. 21.36.360.
Fraudulent or criminal insurance acts.

A person may not commit a fraudulent or criminal insurance act involving an insurance transaction that is subject to the provisions of this title. The penalty for a fraudulent or criminal insurance act described in this section is in addition to a civil penalty levied under this title.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who, with intent to injure, defraud, or deceive,

collects a sum as premium or charge for insurance if the insurance has not been provided or is not in due course to be provided, subject to acceptance of the risk by the insurer, by an insurance policy authorized under this title;

presents to an insurer a written or oral statement in support of a claim for payment or other benefit under an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains false, incomplete, or misleading information or omits information concerning a matter material to the claim;

assists or conspires with another to prepare or make a written or oral statement that is presented to an insurer in support of a claim for a benefit under an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains false, incomplete, or misleading information or omits information concerning a matter material to the claim;

wilfully collects as premium or charge for insurance a sum in excess of the premium or charge applicable to the insurance as specified in the policy by the insurer in accordance with the applicable classifications and rates approved by the director, or in cases where classifications and rates are not subject to approval, the premiums and charges applicable to the insurance as specified in the policy and fixed by the insurer;

fails to make disposition of funds received or held or misappropriates funds received or held representing premiums or return premiums;

fails to pay its tax liability under this title when due; or

makes a written or oral statement in response to an insurer’s inquiries related to another person’s claim for payment or other benefit under an insurance policy, knowing that the statement contains false, incomplete, or misleading information or omits information concerning a matter material to the claim.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person forming or proposing to form an insurer, an insurance holding corporation, a stock corporation to finance an insurer or insurance production, a corporation to manage an insurer, a corporation to be attorney-in-fact for a reciprocal insurer, or a syndicate for any of these purposes that advertises, or solicits or receives funds, agreement, stock subscription, or membership on account unless the person has applied for and has received from the director a solicitation permit as required by AS 21.69.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who makes a false sworn statement that the person does not believe to be true as to matter material to an examination, investigation, or hearing of the division.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person if

as to a matter material to an examination, investigation, or hearing by the division, the person makes two or more sworn statements that are irreconcilably inconsistent to the degree that one of them is necessarily false; and

the person does not believe one of the statements to be true at the time the statement is made.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who with intent to deceive, knowingly exhibits a false account, document, or advertisement, relative to the affairs of an insurer, a corporation, or syndicate of the kind described in AS

21.69.060

, formed or proposed to be formed.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who wrongfully removes or attempts to remove records from the place where they are required to be kept under AS

21.69.390(a)

or who conceals or attempts to conceal records from the director.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 52 SLA 2015.]

A criminal insurance act is committed by a person doing business in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state who knowingly

writes, places, or causes to be written or placed in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state a policy, duplicate policy, or contract of insurance of any kind or character, or general or floating policy upon persons or property resident, situated, or located in this state, from or through a person not authorized to transact business under AS 21.27 or a risk retention group or purchasing group not registered under AS

21.96.090

; or

pays a commission or other form of remuneration to a person, firm, or organization for the writing or placing of insurance coverage in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state unless that person, firm, or organization is authorized under AS 21.27 to transact the kind or class of insurance written or placed, or, in the case of a risk retention group or purchasing group, is registered under AS

21.96.090

.

A criminal insurance act is committed by a person in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state who acts as an insurance producer, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster without being licensed by the director as required under this title or as a risk retention group or purchasing group without being registered as required under AS

21.96.090

. A criminal insurance act is committed by an insurance producer, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, or surplus lines broker who solicits or takes application for, procures, or places for others any insurance for which the person is not licensed as required under AS 21.27 or for which the license of the person has been suspended or revoked. A criminal insurance act is committed by a person in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state who acts as or on behalf of a risk retention group or a purchasing group that is not registered under AS

21.96.090

.

A criminal insurance act is committed by an insurance producer, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, or surplus lines broker who knowingly compensates or offers to compensate in any manner a person other than an insurance producer, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, or surplus lines broker licensed as required under this title in this or another jurisdiction, for procuring or in any manner helping to procure applications for or to place insurance in this state. A criminal insurance act is committed by a person in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state who acts as or on behalf of a risk retention group or a purchasing group that is not registered under AS

21.96.090

. This subsection does not apply to the payment of compensation that is not contingent upon volume of business transacted in the form of salaries to the regular employees of the insurance producer, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, or surplus lines broker.

A criminal insurance act is committed by a person who has placed insurance with an unauthorized insurer and refuses to obey an order by the director to produce for examination all policies and other documents evidencing the insurance and the amount of premiums paid or agreed to be paid for the insurance.

A criminal insurance act is committed by a director of a domestic stock or mutual insurer who votes for or concurs in a declaration or payment of a dividend to stockholders or members other than as authorized under AS

21.69.490

—

21.69.500

.

A criminal insurance act is committed by an agent, managing general agent, third-party administrator, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, or other representative of an insurer involved in the procuring or issuance of an insurance contract who intentionally fails to report to the insurer the exact amount of consideration charged as premium for the contract and to maintain records showing that information.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who, with intent to injure, defraud, or deceive, knowingly makes a false or fraudulent statement or representation in or with reference to an application for insurance.

A fraudulent insurance act is committed by a person who

violates a provision of this title or a regulation issued under it;

falsely makes, completes, or alters a certificate of insurance or other document relating to insurance;

knowingly possesses a forged certificate of insurance or other document relating to insurance; or

knowingly issues a forged certificate of insurance or other document relating to insurance.

A fraudulent or criminal insurance act described in

(b) of this section that is committed to obtain $10,000 or more is a class B felony;

(c), (d), or (p)(4) of this section is a class B felony;

(b) of this section that is committed to obtain $500 or more but less than $10,000 is a class C felony;

(e), (f), (g), or (p)(2) or (3) of this section is a class C felony;

(b) of this section that is committed to obtain less than $500 is a class A misdemeanor;

(i), (j), (k), (l), (m), or (n) of this section is a class A misdemeanor;

(o) of this section is a class B misdemeanor; and

(p)(1) of this section is a class B misdemeanor unless another specific penalty is provided for the violation of the provision.

The director may adopt regulations to implement, define, and enforce this section.

For the purpose of this section, the charging and collection by surplus line brokers licensed under AS 21.27 of the amount of applicable state and federal taxes and filing fees under AS 21.34 is not considered a premium or charge for insurance.

History.

(§ 10 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 27 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 30 ch 30 SLA 1992; am §§ 62 — 67 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 72 ch 81 SLA 2001; am §§ 12 — 14 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 60 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§ 51, 52 ch 34 SLA 2015; am §§
33, 34 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (s) was formerly AS

21.36.370

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “this section” was substituted for “ AS

21.36.370

”.
In 2010, in (i), (j), and (k), “ AS

21.96.090

” was substituted for “ AS 21.89.090” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS 21.89.090.

Cross references. —

For penalties for felonies, see AS

12.55.125

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (q)(4) substituted “(e), (f), or (g) of this section” for “(e), (f), or (h) of this section”; repealed (h).

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (b), inserted “or omits information” following “misleading information in two places, added (b)(7); in (q)(4), inserted “, or (p)(2) or (3)” preceding “of this section”; deleted (q)(8); and made related changes.

Sec. 21.36.365.
Immunity for reports on fraud.

A person is not liable for civil damages for filing a report with or furnishing other information whether written or oral, concerning suspected, anticipated, or completed fraudulent acts to

law enforcement officials, their agents, and employees;

the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, the division of insurance, an agency in a state that regulates insurance, or an organization established to detect and prevent fraudulent insurance acts, their agents, employees, or designees;

a person involved in the prevention and detection of fraudulent insurance acts or that person’s employees, agents, or representatives.

This section does not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of reckless, wilful, or intentional misconduct.

History.

(§ 52 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 41 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.36.370.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.360(s).]

Sec. 21.36.380.
Notice on claim form.

A claim form must contain a statement that states in substance the following: “A person who knowingly and with intent to injure, defraud, or deceive an insurance company files a claim containing false, incomplete, or misleading information may be prosecuted under state law.” A lack of the statement on a claim form does not constitute a defense to prosecution under this title.

History.

(§ 10 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 68 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.36.390.
Notice to director.

An insurer or licensee that has reason to believe that a fraudulent claim has been made against it shall send the director a report disclosing information that the director may require.

An insurer or licensee that has reason to believe that an insurance producer with which it is doing business is involved in a defalcation, embezzlement, or violation of the provisions of AS

21.36.030

,

21.36.050

, or

21.36.360

shall immediately send the director a report disclosing the basis for that belief and any other information that the director may require.

An insurer or licensee, its employee or agent, or another person acting in good faith is not civilly liable for damages resulting from the filing of the report or the furnishing of information required by this section or by the director.

The director shall investigate facts reported under this section and shall refer facts indicating a violation of law to the appropriate prosecutor or agency.

History.

(§ 10 ch 149 SLA 1984; am § 38 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 35 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (b), substituted “AS

21.36.030

,

21.36.050

, or

21.36.360

” for “AS

21.36.360

”.

Sec. 21.36.400.
Confidentiality.

The papers, reports, documents, and evidence received under AS

21.36.390

or an investigation arising out of information received under AS

21.36.390

are not subject to public inspection for so long as the director considers confidentiality to be in the public interest or reasonably necessary to complete an investigation or protect the person investigated from unwarranted injury. Papers, reports, documents, and evidence relative to an investigation under this section are confidential and not subject to subpoena unless, after notice to the director and a hearing, a court determines the director would not be unduly hindered by public inspection.

An investigator of the director is not subject to subpoena in a civil action by a court of this state to testify concerning a matter that the investigator has knowledge of under a pending insurance fraud investigation by the director.

History.

(§ 10 ch 149 SLA 1984)

Sec. 21.36.410.
Out-of-state investigations.

If material the director seeks to obtain is located outside the state, the material may be made available to the director to examine at the place where the material is located. The director may designate representatives, including officials of the state in which the material is located, to inspect the material on behalf of the director.

The director may respond to a request from an official of another state under procedures established in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 10 ch 149 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For unfair claims settlement acts or practices, see 3 AAC 26, art. 1.

Sec. 21.36.420.
Premium increases on automobile insurance policies. [Repealed, § 112 ch 62 SLA 1995.]